tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Mutfak Aleti Aksesuarları > Buz Yapıcı Aksesuarları: Buz Makinesi Kutuları; Buz Makinesi Temizleme Solüsyonları; Buz Yapıcı Kepçeleri; Buz Makinesi Su Filtreleri; Buz Makinesi Su Hattı Kitleri
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Accessoires voor keukenmachines > Accessoires voor ijsmakers: Bakjes voor ijsmachines; Reinigingsmiddelen voor ijsmachines; Lepels voor ijsmakers; Waterfilters voor ijsmachines; Wateraansluitsets voor ijsmachines
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Pribor za kuhinjske aparate > Pribor za ledomate: Kante za ledomat; Otopine za čišćenje ledomata; Žlice za ledomate; Filtri za vodu za aparate za sladoled; Kompleti za dovod vode za ledomate
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Аксесоари за кухненски уреди > Аксесоари за ледогенератор: Контейнери за ледогенератори; Препарати за почистване на ледогенератори; Лопатки за лед; Водни филтри за ледогенератори; Комплекти за водопроводно свързване на ледогенератори
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Keittiölaitteiden lisätarvikkeet > Jääpalakoneen lisätarvikkeet: Jääpalakoneen laatikot; Jääpalakoneen puhdistusliuokset; Jääpalakoneen kauhat; Jäätelökoneiden vedensuodattimet; Jääpalakoneen vesijohtosarjat
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Virtuvės prietaisų priedai > Ledo gaminimo aparatų priedai: Ledo gaminimo aparato dėžės; Ledo gaminimo aparato valymo sprendimai; Ledo gaminimo aparatų kaušeliai; Ledo gaminimo aparatų vandens filtrai; Ledo gaminimo aparato vandens linijos rinkinys
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Accessori strumenti cucina > Accessori per macchine del ghiaccio: Contenitori per macchina del ghiaccio; Soluzioni per la pulizia di macchine del ghiaccio; Palette per macchina del ghiaccio; Filtri per gelatiere; Kit linea acqua per macchine del ghiaccio
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Phụ kiện đồ dùng nhà bếp > Phụ kiện máy làm kem: Thùng trữ cho máy làm đá; Dung dịch vệ sinh máy làm đá; Muỗng xúc của máy làm kem; Bộ Lọc Nước Máy Làm Đá; Bộ dây cấp nước máy làm đá
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Acessórios para eletrodomésticos de cozinha > Acessórios para máquinas de fazer gelo: Compartimentos para máquinas de gelo; Soluções de limpeza para máquinas de gelo; Colheres para máquina de gelo; Filtros de água para máquinas de gelo; Kits de mangueira de água para máquinas de gelo
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > อุปกรณ์เครื่องใช้ในครัว > อุปกรณ์เครื่องทำน้ำแข็ง: ถังเครื่องทำน้ำแข็ง; น้ำยาทำความสะอาดเครื่องทำน้ำแข็ง; ที่ตักในเครื่องทำน้ำแข็ง; ตัวกรองน้ำสำหรับเครื่องทำน้ำแข็ง; ชุดท่อน้ำสำหรับเครื่องทำน้ำแข็ง
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Accessoires petit électroménager > Accessoires pour machines à glace: Bacs pour machine à glaçons; Solutions de nettoyage pour machines à glaçons; Cuillères pour machine à glace; Filtres à eau pour machines à glaçons; Kits de raccordement à l'eau pour machine à glaçons
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Аксессуары для кухонной техники > Аксессуары для льдогенераторов: Контейнеры льдогенератора; Средства для очистки льдогенератора; Совки для льдогенераторов; Фильтры для воды для генераторов льда; Комплект водопроводной линии для льдогенератора
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Tilbehør til kjøkkenapparater > Tilbehør til ismaskiner: Ismaskinbeholdere; Rengjøringsløsninger for iskremmaskin; Skjeer til ismaskiner; Vannfiltre til ismaskiner; Vannrørsett til ismakermaskin
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Accesorios para aparatos de cocina > Accesorios para máquinas de hielo: Contenedores de máquina de hielo; Soluciones de limpieza para máquinas de hielo; Palas para máquina de hielo; Tapas para máquinas de helado; Kits de línea de agua para fabricadora de hielo
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Akcesoria do sprzętów kuchennych > Akcesoria do maszynek do lodu: Pojemniki do kostkarek do lodu; Środki czyszczące do kostkarek do lodu; Łyżki do maszynek do lodu; Filtry wody do kostkarek do lodu; Zestawy doprowadzania wody do kostkarek do lodu
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 廚房電器配件 > 製冰機配件: 製冰機儲冰盒; 製冰機清潔液; 製冰機勺; 製冰機濾水器; 製冰機供水管套件
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 厨房电器配件 > 制冰机配件: 制冰机储冰盒; 制冰机清洁剂; 制冰机勺; 制冰机水过滤器; 制冰机水管套件
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Αξεσουάρ οικιακών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ παγομηχανών: Δοχεία πάγου παγομηχανής; Καθαριστικά παγομηχανής; Μεζούρες παγομηχανών; Φίλτρα νερού παγομηχανής; Κιτ παροχής νερού παγομηχανής
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Kitchen Appliance Accessories > Ice Maker Accessories: Ice Maker Bins; Ice Maker Cleaning Solutions; Ice Maker Scoops; Ice Maker Water Filters; Ice Maker Water Line Kits
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Kuchyňské spotřebiče – příslušenství > Příslušenství k výrobníkům ledu: Nádoby na led do výrobníků; Řešení pro čištění výrobníku ledu; Lopatky na led k výrobníku ledu; Vodní filtry zmrzlinovačů; Vodovodní sady pro výrobníky ledu
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Dodatki za kuhinjske aparate > Dodatki za aparate za sladoled: Posode za izdelovalce ledu; Rešitve za čiščenje za izdelovalce ledu; Žlice za aparate za sladoled; Filtri za vodo za aparate za izdelavo sladoleda; Kompleti vodnih cevi za izdelovalce ledu
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Acessórios de aparelhos domésticos > Acessórios para máquina de gelo: Bandejas para máquinas de gelo; Soluções de limpeza para máquinas de gelo; Pás de máquina de gelo; Filtros de água para máquina de gelo; Kits de tubagem de água para máquinas de gelo
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Príslušenstvo pre kuchynské spotrebiče > Príslušenstvo pre výrobníky ľadu: Nádoby pre výrobníky ľadu; Riešenia na čistenie výrobníkov ľadu; Naberačky pre výrobníky ľadu; Vodné filtre do výrobníkov ľadu; Sady vodovodných hadičiek pre výrobníky ľadu
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Køkkenapparater – tilbehør > Tilbehør til ismaskiner: Beholdere til ismaskiner; Rengøringsløsninger til ismaskiner; Ismaskine – skeer; Vandfiltre til ismaskiner; Vandledningssæt til ismaskiner
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Tillbehör till köksapparater > Ismaskinstillbehör: Isfack; Rengöringslösningar för ismaskiner; Ismaskinsskopor; Vattenfilter för ismaskiner; Vattenledningssatser för ismaskiner
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > キッチン家電関連用品 > 製氷機関連用品: 製氷機用バケツ; 製氷機用クリーニング液; 製氷機スクープ; 製氷機用浄水器; 製氷機用給水ラインキット
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Accesorii pentru electrocasnice de bucătărie > Accesorii mașină de gheață: Recipiente pentru mașină de gheață; Soluții de curățare pentru mașină de gheață; Lingură mașină de gheață; Filtre de apă pentru mașini de înghețată; Kit conductă de apă pentru mașină de gheață
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 주방가전 부대용품 > 제빙기 부대용품: 제빙기 수납함; 제빙기 세정제; 제빙기 스쿱; 제빙기 물 필터; 제빙기 급수 라인 키트
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Zubehör für Küchengeräte > Zubehör für Eismaschinen: Eismaschinen-Behälter; Reinigungslösungen für Eismaschinen; Eismaschinen-Portionierer; Wasserfilter für Eismaschinen; Wasserleitungssets für Eismaschinen
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Konyhaigép-kiegészítők > Jégkészítő-kiegészítők: Jégkészítő tartályok; Jégkészítő tartály tisztítószerek; Jégkészítő-kanalak; Jégkészítő-vízszűrők; Jégkészítő vízvezeték-készletek